Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-528
Contracting public body; estimate of expenses; appropriations; bonds authorized.

A contracting public body may, at such time as it may deem necessary, file with the governing body or governing bodies to which it relates an estimate of the amounts necessary to be appropriated by the governing body or governing bodies to defray the expense of the contracting public body arising under the Nebraska Redevelopment Act. Such governing body may appropriate from its general fund and place at the disposal of the contracting public body an amount sufficient to assist in defraying such expense. Any city or county located within the area of operation of the contracting public body or the designated blighted and substandard area may grant funds to a contracting public body for the purpose of aiding such contracting public body in carrying out any of its powers and functions under the act. To obtain funds for this purpose, such city or county may levy taxes and may issue and sell its bonds. Any bonds to be issued by such city or county pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations, except as otherwise provided by the act, prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by a city or county for any public purpose.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 28.